District of Columbia statutes.
31-4302

Collection of charges and fees.

(a)

All charges and fees provided for in this section shall be collected by the Commissioner and made payable to the District of Columbia.

(b)

For filing charter or articles of incorporation or association, or deed of settlement or copy thereof, required by law, $300; for each company certificate of authority, $200, renewal fee, $200; for license of each general agent, $100, renewal fee, $100; for license of each agent, or solicitor, $50, renewal fee $50; for license of each broker, $100, renewal fee, $100. For each appointment fee for each agent, general agent, or each solicitor, $25 fee, $25 renewal fee; provided, however, that beginning October 1, 1994, the license and renewal fee of each general agent, agent or solicitor, and broker shall be payable biennially in accordance with the rulemaking procedures in section 3(a)(2).

(c)

The Mayor may amend all fees referred to in this chapter by rulemaking pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1130, ch. 672, ch. II, § 2
Feb. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-52, § 2, 27 DCR 26
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 401, 41 DCR 2096
Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-90, § 10, 42 DCR 7155
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i), 44 DCR 1730
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
Taxation and fiscal affairs of insurance companies, see § 47-2601 et
This section is referenced in § 31-3503.
1981 Ed., § 35-402.
1973 Ed., § 35-402.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 10 of Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-36, September 8, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5305).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 11 of the Insurance Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-48, May 15, 1995, 42 DCR 2544) and § 10 of the Insurance Omnibus Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-97, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3844).
“Section 3(a)(2),” referred to in (b), is § 3(a)(2) of chapter II of the Life Insurance Act, approved June 19, 1934, Pub. L. 73-436, 48 Stat. 1130, ch. 672.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.